Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB88.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 43 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) In accordance with 26 U.S.C. sec. 25F(g):
(a) The General Assembly hereby elects that in each calendar year the
Commonwealth of Kentucky shall:
1. Participate in the qualified elementary and secondary education
scholarship federal tax credit established under 26 U.S.C. sec. 25F, or
any successor program, for individuals who make qualifying
contributions to scholarship granting organizations; and
2. Identify scholarship granting organizations located in the state; and
(b) The Auditor of Public Accounts is hereby designated under Kentucky law as
the official authorized to:
1. Report the state's election to participate in the qualified elementary
and secondary education scholarship federal tax credit established
under 26 U.S.C. sec. 25F; and
2. Submit to the Secretary of the Treasury under 26 U.S.C. sec. 25F(g)
the list of the state's scholarship granting organizations that meet the
requirements of 26 U.S.C. sec. 25F.
(2) (a) The Auditor of Public Accounts shall maintain the state's list of scholarship
granting organizations and publish the list on the Auditor's website.
(b) The website shall also provide any administrative regulations promulgated
by the Auditor under subsection (3) of this section and other applicable
guidance issued by the United States Secretary of the Treasury or the
Internal Revenue Service.
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/6/2026 5:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 275
(3) The Auditor may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to establish the application process and documentation necessary
for an entity to qualify to be included as a scholarship granting organization on
the list maintained under subsection (2) of this section.
(4) The Auditor may enter into agreements with other state agencies to assist in
implementing this section.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/6/2026 5:01 PM Jacketed